Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.635

Public works or improvements—Low bidder claiming error—Prohibition on later bid for same project.

A low bidder who claims error and fails to enter into a contract with a city for a public works project is prohibited from bidding on the same project if a second or subsequent call for bids is made for the project.

[ 1996 c 18 s 1.]